[1]              
This is a motion for certification of this action.
As stated in their factum, the Plaintiffs seek to certify the action on behalf
of potentially thousands of class members who have been affected by the
Defendant’s alleged failures.
[2]              
The Plaintiffs cast their case against the Defendant,
the Attorney General of Canada (“Canada”) as one that involves systemic problems
in Canada’s Cadet Program, that has permitted sexual misconduct against female
cadets to go unaddressed and unpunished because of its failures to implement
proper procedures or abide by existing policies.
[3]              
The plaintiff, Hilary Lockhart (“HL”), became a
member of the Cadet Program in 2008 at the age of 14 and remained a member
until 2012. Todd Evans, formerly Master Corporal Todd Evans, was a reservist
who was a volunteer in 2008/09 in HL’s Air Cadet squadron. In September 2009,
Evans pled guilty to the charge of invitation to sexual touching in relation to
HL. He was charged after HL’s mother, the plaintiff, Melissa Lockhart (“ML”),
discovered inappropriate messages from Evans on her computer. Before he was
charged, HL alleges that she reported his conduct to a cadet supervisor, but no
action was taken. After he was charged, neither HL nor ML were offered supports
or resources through the Cadet Program.
[4]              
HL now seeks to be the representative plaintiff
to represent a Cadet Class in this action. The Fresh as Amended Statement of
Claim (“Claim”) seeks declarations and damages against Canada for negligence,
breach of fiduciary duty, negligent misrepresentation, breach of contract and
breach of s.7 of the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms due
to Canada’s alleged failure to protect female cadet members from misconduct of
a sexual nature.
[5]              
ML seeks to represent the family members of the
Cadet Class as part of a Family Class.
[6]              
The Cadet Class and the Family Class are
collectively referred to as the “Class Members” or “Class” in the Claim.
[7]              
Canada has not yet delivered a Statement of
Defence. The action has not been actively case managed.
[8]              
Throughout their material, the Plaintiffs refer
to the program in which HL participated as “Cadets Canada” or “Cadets”. As
explained in the evidence filed on behalf of Canada, the proper nomenclature is
the “Cadet Program”. Where these terms are used interchangeably throughout
these Reasons, they all refer to the same program.
[9]              
The definition of the Class went through three
iterations over the course of this motion. Ultimately, the class definition
that this court has been asked to consider is:
[10]          
The Notice of Motion sets out 33 common issues
for certification. These were considerably pared down by the time that the
Plaintiffs prepared their factum; the revised list is attached as Schedule C to
the Plaintiffs’ factum.
[11]          
The proposed Common Issues that this court is
asked to certify are as follows:
[12]          
The evidence for this motion consists of:
[13]          
To appreciate the full context of this action, an
understanding of the scope of the Cadet Program is required. Canada has offered
evidence about the Cadet Program through the Oulton affidavit. Oulton is a
member of the Canadian Armed Forces (“CAF”) responsible for personnel
administration and policy development in her current role in the Cadets and
Junior Canadian Rangers Group (“CJCR Gp”).
[14]          
The Cadet Program is a national community-based
youth development program. The mandate of the Cadet Program is to contribute to
the development and preparation of youth for the transition to adulthood, enabling
them to meet the challenges of modern society, through a dynamic,
community-based program.
[15]          
There are four Canadian Cadet Organizations
(“CCO”): the Royal Canadian Sea Cadets, the Royal Canadian Army Cadets, the
Royal Canadian Air Cadets, and the Junior Canadian Rangers. Only the first
three are part of the Cadet Program. In 2008, HL was a member of the local
Royal Canadian Army Cadet Corps in Dryden, Ontario.
[16]          
The formation of CCO and its administration is
authorized by s. 46 of the National Defence Act, R.S.C. 1985, c. N-5 (“NDA”):
[17]          
As of August 30, 2023, the CCO was comprised of 41,439
youths in 1,088 corps and squadrons across Canada, located in rural and urban
areas within every province and territory.
[18]          
From 2000 to the end of 2007, it is estimated
that 66,462 female cadets were registered in the Cadet Program across Canada.
[19]          
From 2008 to 2022, a total of 108,424 female
cadets were registered in the Cadet Program in Canada.
[20]          
The Cadet Program is sponsored by the CAF and
funded through the Department of National Defence and three civilian non-profit
organizations: the Navy League of Canada, the Army Cadet League of Canada, and
the Air Cadet League of Canada (“Cadet Leagues”). The Cadet Leagues are not
part of the CAF or DND.
[21]          
In accordance with s. 46 of the NDA, the
Canadian Forces are responsible to the Minister of National Defence for the
control and supervision of the CCO. In carrying out this responsibility, the
Cadet Leagues work with the Canadian Forces to administer the cadet program.
[22]          
The Cadet Leagues also approve and supervise the
local sponsors of each cadet corps and squadron.
[23]          
The core of the Cadet Program is the
corps/squadron program, which normally takes place during the school year and
consists of thirty training sessions, normally on weekday evenings. It also
includes ten supported full-days normally held on weekends, during which cadets
engage in activities such as field training exercises and citizenship tours.
[24]          
Cadet activities during the school year take
place in public buildings such as schools, legions and churches. Some are
located on DND facilities such as Royal Canadian Navy, Canadian Army, and Royal
Canadian Air Force reserve unit buildings and on Canadian Forces bases.
[25]          
Local, regional and national activities can
occur either on DND facilities or at conference centres, hotels, sporting
venues or similar locations.
[26]          
Activities are also available for cadets during
the summer. These activities normally occur at cadet training centres, which
are primarily on CAF bases, and sometimes held in other venues, such as
conference centres, hotels and private training facilities.
[27]          
Cadets can also participate in international and
domestic cadet exchanges. The Cadet Leagues also organize their own
recreational programs for cadets, and provide transportation for local training
exercises when not available from the CAF.
[28]          
Cadets are supervised by CAF members, generally
members of the Cadets Organizations Administration and Training Service
(“COATS”), and civilian instructors.
[29]          
Supervisors are also assisted by volunteers and
senior cadets. Volunteers and senior cadets can only assist in authorized cadet
activities and under the supervision and direction of a supervisor.
[30]          
The COATS is a sub-component of the Reserve
Force, and its members are members of the CAF. The primary duty of COATS
members is the supervision, administration, and training of cadets or Junior
Canadian Rangers, who are members of the CCO.
[31]          
The largest contingent of COATS is composed of
officers belonging to the Cadet Instructors Cadre (“CIC”). The CIC is a
personnel branch of the CAF, the members of which are officers who are
specifically trained to provide for the safety, supervision, and training of
cadets. The CIC currently consists of approximately 7,800 officers.
[32]          
Regular Force and Reserve Force members outside
of COATS may also instruct and supervise cadets.
[33]          
Civilian instructors (who are not members of the
CAF) are also employed in some instances. Civilian instructors may be employed
at a corps, squadron, cadet training centre, or cadet activity program.
Civilian volunteers (also not members of the CAF) assist cadet instructors and
civilian instructors where there are no qualified CAF members available to fill
a position in support of authorized cadet activities.
[34]          
Senior cadets (16 years of age or older) who
have passed the necessary training requirements also supervise authorized cadet
activities, although under the supervision and direction of a supervisor.
[35]          
All COATS members, civilian instructors, and
civilian volunteers are governed by policies that require a police record check
and vulnerable sector screening. Other persons who have direct contact with the
cadets and are not under the constant supervision of a COATS member, civilian
instructor, or civilian volunteer, whether other CAF members, DND employees, or
civilian contractors are also governed by policy and are required to have, at minimum,
a police record check and vulnerable sector screening.
[36]          
The overarching policy is set out in the Queens
Regulations and Orders for the Canadian Cadet Organizations (“QR
(Cadets)”), which came into effect on January 26, 1978. The QR (Cadets)
are issued under the authority of the NDA.
[37]          
Cadet Administrative and Training Orders
(“CATOs”) are mandatory policies that supplement the QR (Cadets). CJCR
Gp Orders are mandatory policies that are gradually replacing CATOs.
[38]          
There are multiple CATOs. They exist for
harassment prevention and resolution, administrative procedures to be followed
in situations where a cadet is facing social issues such as self-destructive
thoughts/behaviour, including suicide, the conduct and discipline of cadets,
supervision of cadets, recruitment and screening, and reporting of significant
incidents. A version of each of these CATOs was in effect during the time that HL
was enrolled in the Cadet Program.
[39]          
Records are held by the Cadet Program consisting
of a Cadet Information Card for each cadet. HL’s Cadet Information Card
indicates that she was a cadet from September 2008 to January 2012.
[40]          
As an aside, there is a conflict in the evidence
about where HL was located at the time of Evans’ conduct. She states that this
occurred in Dryden between 2008/09. The Cadet Information Card produced in the
Oultan affidavit states that HL did not move to Army Cadet 2072 RCACC in Dryden
until September 2010, and prior to that she was in the Air Cadet RCACS 908 in
Fort Frances. However, the recommendation for administrative review pertaining
to Evans was initiated on November 10, 2009, and the administrative review
decision indicates that the incident occurred while he was volunteering in
Dryden. While argument was made about how the inaccurate record keeping of the
Cadet Program might reflect on the credibility of Canada’s evidence, the
certification motion is not the place to resolve conflicting facts and
evidence: Banman v. Ontario, 2023 ONSC 6187, at para.180.
[41]          
Oultan’s evidence is that cadets, adults and
their parents are provided with training on sexual assault and sexual abuse.
Such training was provided during the time that HL was a cadet.
[42]          
Oulton also provided evidence of the complaint
procedure that would be followed when a cadet reports a complaint of sexual
misconduct, harassment, abuse, etc. The person to whom it was disclosed would
ensure the immediate safety of the complainant and generate a safety plan, if
necessary, based on training and policies within the Cadet Program. If
necessary, their supervisor would be contacted to obtain direction. Depending
on the nature and circumstances of the incident, the appropriate police
authority may be contacted, and the information would be immediately reported
to the chain of command. Less severe incidents, such as inappropriate jokes, not
involving individuals external to the Cadet Program are handled internally
through enforcement of the code of conduct and alternative dispute resolution.
[43]          
Persons who receive a disclosure would ensure
complete notes are taken on the information contained in the disclosure or
complaint of the steps taken, who was contacted and when, and the next steps,
if known. This information would then be communicated to the designated Regional
Cadet Support Unit (“RCSU”), which is commanded by a Lieutenant Colonel/Commander-level
commanding officer. The RCSU would generate the Significant Incident Report and
follow-up regarding the incident if necessary.
[44]          
The Oultan affidavit is silent as to whether a
formal complaint was ever recorded by a cadet supervisor in Dryden’s Air Cadet
squadron before Evans’ behaviour came to the attention of the police.
[45]          
If the perpetrator is a CAF member, civilian
instructor, cadet, or volunteer, they may be suspended from the Cadet Program
until such time as the incident investigation has been completed. Depending on
the outcome of the investigation, the respondent may be subject to additional
administrative action such as release from the CAF or removal from the Cadet
Program.
[46]          
Mr. Evans was released from the CAF for
unsatisfactory conduct in February 2010. He challenged the recommendation of
release but, following the administrative review, the unit commanding officer maintained
the recommendation that he be released from the CAF.
[47]          
HL joined the Cadet Program in 2008 when she was
14 years old. She attended once a week and participated in field training
exercises and camping trips. It was then that she met Evans, who was a Cadet
instructor. He was 23 years old at the time.
[48]          
It is her evidence that he began to groom her by
offering her rides to and from meetings and friended her on Facebook, asking to
communicate with her on MSN messenger.
[49]          
He began to make sexually inappropriate jokes
toward her. As a result of her discomfort with his behaviour, in mid-November 2008,
HL alleges that she approached the only female cadet instructor and reported
his behaviour. HL’s account is that the female instructor dismissed her
complaints and accused her of lying. That instructor did not communicate HL’s
complaint to ML, nor did the instructor request that HL make a written
complaint or investigate the complaint any further. HL was also never provided
with alternate support or resources through the Cadet Program as a result of
her report.
[50]          
HL’s evidence is that she began to believe that
she may have overreacted and began to question her own perception of what had
occurred with Evans, all after being disbelieved by the female cadet
instructor.
[51]          
Evans continued to provide her with rides to and
from the cadet meetings. During this time, it is her evidence that she suffered
from numerous health conditions and was being severely bullied at school. This
was a turning point in the dynamics with Evans, and she began to confide in him
about the issues that she was facing. Their chats on Messenger became more frequent.
HL’s evidence is that Evans groomed her into believing that they were evolving
into a “relationship”.
[52]          
On an occasion in January 2009, she began using
a web camera with Evans. During this interaction, Evans suggested that she remove
her clothing for his sexual gratification. He also began to make plans for the
two of them to meet in a hotel in Dryden and described the sexual activities in
which they would engage.
[53]          
Fortunately, this did not come to pass. HL’s
parents lived in two different homes, and HL ended up going to spend time at her
father’s home. In HL’s absence, her mother discovered the chats with Evans on HL’s
computer and reported his conduct to the police.
[54]          
Evans was charged with invitation to sexual touching,
sexual exploitation, and child luring contrary to ss. 152, 153(1)(b), and
172.1(1) of the Criminal Code of Canada, R.S.C. 1985, c. C-46.
[55]          
Evans pled guilty to the charge under s. 152 of
the Code as part of a plea deal. HL describes that the entire criminal
proceeding was extremely difficult, including participating in the sentencing
hearing.
[56]          
Throughout these events she received no support
from the Cadets Program. She was feeling extremely emotional and mentally
distraught. During a cadets meeting, she states that she confided in one of her
friends about feeling suicidal due to the trauma that was caused by Evans and
the lack of support by the Cadet Program. The same female instructor to whom
she had originally told about Evans overheard her conversation and instructed
her that she was not permitted to talk about these topics during a meeting. The
instructor offered no assistance, and did not report the conversation to ML.
[57]          
HL describes a downward spiral after Evans’
sentencing. It is her evidence that she has been hospitalized due to her mental
health on numerous occasions, has attempted suicide, has been placed on
numerous psychotropic drugs, was placed in foster homes when even her parents
could not handle her violent outbursts and mental health issues. She was required
to live in group homes and was also homeless.
[58]          
This changed in around November 2012 when she
moved in with her grandmother, obtained her high school diploma and completed a
college diploma. Her affidavit indicates that she is currently attending York
University. However, even after this action was commenced and she had to relive
the events during her time as a cadet, she was again hospitalized due to her
Post Traumatic Stress Disorder symptoms. She attributes these events to her
experience with Evans, but also her experience in the aftermath of trying to
report his misconduct, being disbelieved, and being provided with no support.
[59]          
ML’s evidence is that after she discovered the
messages, she learned from HL that she had attempted to reach out to
“individuals” within the Cadets Program to alert them to what was happening,
but no response had been forthcoming. ML also states that she raised her
concerns with a member of the Cadet Program, but nothing was done.
[60]          
ML alleges that she has also suffered damages as
a result of HL’s experience in the Cadet Program and the difficulties that
developed in their lives thereafter, and due to receiving no support or
resources from the Cadet Program.
[61]          
The Oulton affidavit also provides evidence
about recent reforms made by the CAF and DND to address the issue of sexual
misconduct, which provide additional support for cadets.
[62]          
The Sexual Misconduct Support and Resource
Centre (“SMSRC”) was created in 2015 in response to the recommendation from the
Honourable Marie Deschamps in her March 2015 External Review into Sexual
Misconduct and Sexual Harassment in the Canadian Armed Forces (the “Deschamps
Report”) that such a centre be created outside of the CAF chain of command so
that it can confidentially receive reports of sexual misconduct and harassment.
[63]          
Under its current mandate, the SMSRC provides
and facilitates access to support services and resources for persons affected
by sexual misconduct within DND/CAF. The clientele who are able to access SMSRC
services include cadets aged 16 and older and their family members. These
services include a 24/7 Response and Support Line and the Response and Support
Coordination Program. Counsellors are trained in supporting individuals affected
by sexual misconduct and crisis intervention.
[64]          
The Response and Support Coordination Program
provides ongoing support, advocacy and personalized case management services
for those directly affected by sexual misconduct.
[65]          
Cadets aged 16 and older, or the parent or legal
guardian of those under the age of 18, are also eligible to participate in the
Independent Legal Assistance Program. This program facilitates access to free
and independent legal assistance for victims of sexual misconduct.
[66]          
The only issue to be decided is whether the Plaintiffs
have met the requirements for certification prescribed by s. 5 of the Class
Proceedings Act, 1992, S.O. 1992, c. 6 (“CPA”).
[67]          
After a consideration of the applicable law and
the facts of this case, this court has determined that this action should not
be certified.
[68]          
This decision is not intended to detract from
the gravity of what occurred to HL due to Evans’ conduct, or its effect on her
or any of her family members. Sexual misconduct offences against children are
heinous crimes, recognized by our highest court to inflict grievous,
long-lasting injury on those whose trust has been violated by adult offenders: R.
v. Friesen, 2020 SCC 9, [2020] 1 S.C.R. 424: paras. 58, 77-82. A class
action, however, is not the vehicle by which this wrong can be appropriately addressed
on the particular facts of this case.
[69]          
Section 5(1) of the CPA requires that the
court certify a class proceeding if all of the requirements of that section are
met. The Plaintiffs must meet all of the following five criteria:
[70]          
The test for certification is to be applied in a
purposive and generous manner, to give effect to the goals of class actions;
namely: (1) to provide access to justice for litigants; (2) to encourage
behaviour modification; and (3) to promote the efficient use of judicial
resources:  Hollick v. Toronto (City), 2001 SCC 68,
[2001] 3 S.C.R. 158, at paras. 15 and 16; Western Canadian Shopping Centres
Inc. v. Dutton, 2001 SCC 46, [2001] 2 S.C.R. 534, at paras. 26 to 29.
[71]          
The law is clear that the certification stage is
not meant to be a test of the merits of the action. The focus is on whether the
claim can appropriately proceed as a class action: Hollick, at para. 16.
[72]          
For the first requirement, the claim will
disclose a cause of action unless it is plain and obvious that it cannot
succeed.
[73]          
For the last four requirements, the Plaintiffs
must show “some basis in fact” for each of the certification requirements. This
is a lower evidentiary standard than a balance of probabilities. Nonetheless,
certification is a meaningful screening device; although the merits are not to
be determined, “nor does it involve such a superficial level of analysis into
the sufficiency of the evidence that it would amount to nothing more than
symbolic scrutiny”: Pro-Sys Consultants Ltd. v. Microsoft Corporation,
2013 SCC 57, [2013] 3 S.C.R. 477, at paras. 99-103.
[74]          
In Pro-Sys, at paragraph 104, the Supreme
Court of Canada explained that “some basis in fact” means that “there must be
sufficient facts to satisfy the applications judge that the conditions for
certification have been met to a degree that should allow the matter to proceed
on a class basis without foundering at the merits stage”.
[75]          
It is the position of Canada that none of the
certification criteria have been met by the Plaintiffs, and that the Claim
should be dismissed without leave to amend. Accordingly, each of the
requirements must be analyzed.
[76]          
The claim must be read generously, and it will
be unsatisfactory only if it is plain, obvious and beyond a reasonable doubt
that the plaintiff cannot succeed: Hollick, at para. 25.
[77]          
The test for determining whether a pleading
discloses a cause of action derives from Hunt v. Carey Canada Inc.,
1990 CanLII 90 (SCC), [1990] 2 S.C.R. 959. The test is the same as on a motion to strike under r. 21.01(1)(b)
of the Rules of Civil Procedure, R.R.O 1990, Reg. 194.
[78]          
The court must assume that the facts as stated
in the pleading can be proved and must read the pleading generously, making
allowance for drafting deficiencies.
[79]          
A claim fails to disclose a reasonable cause of
action where (a) the plaintiff pleads allegations that do not give rise to a
recognized cause of action; (b) the plaintiff fails to plead a necessary
element of a recognized cause of action; or (c) the allegations in the
pleadings are simply conjecture, assumptions or speculation unsupported by
material facts: Hunter v. Bravener, 2003 CanLII 28855 (Ont. C.A.), at
paras. 3-5, leave to appeal refused, [2003] S.C.C.A. No. 306; Abbasbayli v.
Fiera Foods Company, 2021 ONCA 95, 456 D.L.R. (4th) 668, at para. 20; Graff
v. Network North Reporting and Mediation, 2017 ONSC 7451, 75 C.C.L.I. (5th)
70, at para. 25; and Gjonaj v. Ontario Lottery and Gaming Corporation,
2018 ONSC 2404, at para. 6.
[80]          
Where a claim fails to meet s. 5(1)(a) of the CPA
because it is plain and obvious that it fails to disclose a cause of action, it
should be struck: Hollick, at para. 25.
[81]          
Paragraphs 13 to 28 of the Amended Claim outline
the overarching theory of the Plaintiffs’ case. Their theory is that the Cadet
Program is infected by a discriminatory and sexualized culture that condones
and encourages sexual assault and sexual harassment toward young female cadets.
It is the same culture that was identified as existing in the Canadian Armed
Forces in the Deschamps Report.
[82]          
This systemic culture is a result of the
leadership’s long-standing failure to implement the appropriate policies to
properly train its members to identify, report, investigate and properly
resolve incidents of sexual assault and sexual harassment.
[83]          
Where such policies exist, the Cadet Program violates
such policies by failing to generate written reports, report to police when
required, or to provide a support network for its female cadets.
[84]          
The Claim makes no allegation of vicarious
liability. The Plaintiffs have not pled that Canada is liable vicariously for
acts committed by Evans or any perpetrator.
[85]          
The Claim alleges that HL’s experience of
reporting the abuse but having no follow up by the Cadet Program is not an
isolated incident, as other female cadets have experienced the same level of
negligent reporting. No material facts have been pled to support this bald
allegation relating to the negligent reporting experienced by other cadets.
[86]          
The Claim alleges that from 2006 to 2015 alone,
there were 245 cases of sexual misconduct involving cadets, some involving
adult instructors or reserve officers. Further, the pleading alleges that there
is data showing that in 2015, 27% of all sexual misconduct cases across the CAF
involved cadets.
[87]          
It is alleged that young female cadets are
reluctant to report incidents of sexual assault, sexual harassment, and
gender-based discrimination due to widespread fear of reprisal and negative
repercussions, which allows sexual misconduct to go unpunished.
[88]          
Further, it is alleged that young female cadets
who report incidents face negative consequences that discourage further
reporting, and that Canada has failed to provide support and resources for
those female cadets who have experienced such conduct.
[89]          
There is an inherent power imbalance in the
Cadet Program because the cadets are minors, operating in an organization based
on military principles, with adult supervisors in command. This creates an
environment in which gender-based sexual misconduct has been permitted to
proliferate.
[90]          
The Claim also pleads that beginning in the
1990s, the Cadet Program introduced a mandatory “Cadet Harassment and Abuse
Prevention” program aimed at cadets and instructors that included a series of
videos. The program was updated several years ago and renamed “Positive Social
Relations for Youth.”
[91]          
It is alleged that these policies were put in
place as a direct result of the known culture of harassment and abuse prevalent
within the Cadet Program, which continues despite those policies.
[92]          
No argument was presented from the Plaintiffs in
their factum or submissions about their claim for damages for breach of contract,
from which I infer it is not being seriously pursued. There are also no facts
contained in the claim to support this cause of action. With no material facts
pleaded, there is no reasonable cause of action for breach of contract.
[93]          
Paragraphs 35-46 of the Claim pleads the cause
of action of breach of fiduciary duty, as follows:
[94]          
The question is whether the pleading discloses a
supportable cause of action, taking all the facts pleaded as true. For breach
of fiduciary duty, the leading case governing this question is Elder
Advocates of Alberta Society v. Alberta, 2011 SCC 24, [2011] 2 S.C.R. 261.
[95]          
The relationship between a cadet and Canada is
not one that falls into any of the traditional categories and is not comparable
to the historically recognized category of parent-child or guardian-ward.
Accordingly, in order for there to be a viable claim, the Plaintiffs must
establish the elements of an ad hoc fiduciary relationship as described
in Elder Advocates, at paragraph 36:
[96]          
However, as explained in Elder Advocates,
where it is alleged that the government owes a fiduciary duty to an individual
or class of individuals, a claimant must go further to establish the existence
of limited and special circumstances in which such a fiduciary duty will arise:
at para. 37. These instances will be rare. McLachlin C.J.C. noted that a Crown
fiduciary duty has only been recognized in two contexts: Crown-Aboriginal
relations and where the Crown acts as the public guardian and trustee: at para.
40.
[97]          
First, the Crown’s broad responsibility to act
in the public interest means that situations where it is shown to have a
paramount duty of loyalty to the class of beneficiaries over all others are
rare: at paras. 42-44. If the undertaking of utmost loyalty to the beneficiary
class is alleged to flow from a statute, the language of the legislation must
clearly support it. The mere statutory grant of discretionary power to affect a
person’s interest will not suffice: at para. 45.
[98]          
If the alleged undertaking arises by implication
from the relationship between the parties, the content of the obligation owed
by the government will vary depending on the nature of the relationship and
should be determined by focusing on analogous cases. The Court stated, at paragraph
46, that generally speaking, it will be necessary to find a strong
correspondence with one of the traditional categories of fiduciary relationship
before imposing a fiduciary duty on the government.
[99]          
Similarly, it may be difficult to establish the
second requirement of a defined person or class of persons vulnerable to the
fiduciary’s exercise of discretionary power, as it necessitates the claimant to
show a forsaking of the interests of all others in favour of the beneficiary
class. However, where the government duty is in effect a private duty being
carried out by the government, this requirement may be established: at para.
49.
[100]      
Last, the Court in Elder Advocates
explained that where the alleged fiduciary is the government, the claimant must
show that the interest affected is a specific private law interest to which the
person had a pre-existing distinct legal entitlement. Examples provided include
“the type of fundamental human or personal interest that is implicated when the
state assumes guardianship of a child”: at para. 51.
[101]      
Reading the Claim broadly and generously,
paragraph 45 can be interpreted as alleging that Canada has a duty of loyalty
to act in the interest of the Class Members above all others, as it alleges
that Canada has a duty to fulfill its obligations to Class Members and not to subordinate
those obligations to other interests, namely its own.
[102]      
The Claim does not point to any statute or regulation
from which the undertaking would flow. However, under the separate heading of
“Negligence” in the Claim, the following paragraphs have been drafted:
[103]      
In their reply factum, the Plaintiffs appear to
allege an express undertaking created by regulation, specifically Current Cadet
Administration and Training Order 11-03 Cadet Training Mandate, dated May 2005
(“CATO 11-03”) and (QR Cadet), Chapter 2 – Government and Organization,
dated June 1, 2005.
[104]      
The Plaintiffs point to article 2.30 of the
latter regulation. This provision is entitled “Responsibilities of The Canadian
Forces”. It states that the Canadian Forces are responsible for the provision
of control, supervision and administration of cadet corps, as well as policy on
the enrolment, appointment, promotion, transfer and release of cadet instructors:
art. 2.30(a) and (k). There is nothing within the regulation that permits an
interpretation of an express undertaking to give primacy to the interests of putative
Class Members over any other governmental interest.
[105]      
Similarly, there is no provision in the NDA
or CATO 11-03 that establishes such an undertaking.
[106]      
The Plaintiffs also argue that the alleged
undertaking arises by implication from the relationship between the parties, as
specifically pled in paragraph 39 of the Claim. However, there are no material
facts pled to explain either how this implied undertaking arose, or the content
of the duty.
[107]      
The Plaintiffs have provided a number of cases
in which a claim against the Crown for breach of fiduciary duty has been
certified.
[108]      
The first is Heyder v. Canada (Attorney
General), 2019 FC 1477. Heyder involved a motion to consolidate and certify
two actions as a class proceeding for settlement purposes, where a final
settlement agreement had been reached by the parties in both actions. The
proceedings and settlement encompassed two classes consisting of men and women
who experienced sexual misconduct while serving in the CAF, the Department of
National Defence or as staff.
[109]      
In addressing whether the proposed class
proceeding should be certified, Fothergill J. stated, at paragraph 24:
[110]      
Accordingly, the court in Heyder simply
listed the elements required to establish a fiduciary relationship, as set out
in Elder Advocates, followed by the brief conclusion that the material
facts supporting each of these elements were sufficiently pleaded in the statements
of claim: at para. 28. No analysis was provided as to how a fiduciary
relationship was created in the circumstances of the case. Accordingly, it is
of limited assistance.
[111]      
In Seed v. Ontario, 2012 ONSC 2681, 31
C.P.C. (7th) 76, the action arose out of the Crown’s operation, administration,
and management of a school for the visually impaired. The plaintiff was a
student at the school from age 7 to 18. Horrigan J. stated, at paragraph 99,
that it was not disputed that the law recognizes that a fiduciary duty is owed
in the facts of the case, because “parents, guardians, school boards and other
persons with care of children owe a fiduciary duty to those children”, citing E.D.G.
v. Hammer (1998), 1998 CanLII 15064 (BC SC), 53 B.C.L.R. (3d) 89, at para. 40 (S.C.), aff’d 2001 BCCA
226, aff’d 2003 SCC 52, [2003] 2 S.C.R. 459, at para. 22 and K.L.B. v.
British Columbia, 2003 SCC 51, [2003] 2 S.C.R. 403, at para. 38. Horrigan
J. concluded that the claim sufficiently pled the elements of a fiduciary
relationship and concluded that a viable claim existed.
[112]      
The seminal case of Rumley
v. British Columbia, 2001 SCC 69, [2001] 3 S.C.R.
184 (“Rumley (SCC)”), involved a class proceeding against the province
brought by former students of a residential school for blind and deaf children.
The Court affirmed the decision of the British Columbia Court of Appeal to
define one of the common issues as whether the defendant was negligent or in breach
of their fiduciary duty in failing to take reasonable measures in the operation
or management of the school to protect students from misconduct of a sexual
nature by employees, agents, or other students at the school. The question of
whether the claim disclosed a viable cause of action for breach of fiduciary
duty was not examined in either of the higher courts. It was only at first
instance that the viability of the claim was examined, where Kirkpatrick J. concluded,
at paragraph 37, that it is “arguable that the defendant owed a fiduciary duty
to the students”: Rumley v. British Columbia (1998), 1998 CanLII 3957 (BC SC), 65 B.C.L.R. (3d)
382 (S.C.), rev’d in part on other grounds. In reaching this conclusion,
Kirkpatrick J. cited Hodgkinson v. Simms, 1994 CanLII 70 (SCC), [1994] 3 S.C.R. 377; Norberg
v. Wynrib, 1992 CanLII 65 (SCC), [1992] 2 S.C.R. 226; and E.D.G.
[113]      
E.D.G. was not an
action against the government, but rather against a school janitor and school
board for damages for sexual assault occurring on school property. Norberg
involved a doctor and patient relationship. Hodgkinson involved a
relationship between accountant and client.
[114]      
The Plaintiffs also rely on Cloud v. Canada
(Attorney General) (2003), 2003 CanLII 72353 (ON SCDC), 65 O.R. (3d) 492, (Div. Ct.), rev’d (2004), 2004 CanLII 45444 (ON CA), 73
O.R. (3d) 401 (C.A.) (“Cloud (ONCA)”), leave to appeal refused, [2005]
S.C.C.A. No. 50. That case involved a motion to certify an action against the
federal government involving, among other causes of action, a claim for breach
of fiduciary duty for abuse suffered by students in a residential school. It
was agreed by the parties in that case that the pleadings met the cause of
action criterion, including the claims for breach of fiduciary duty. This case
also does not assist the plaintiffs, as it is recognized in the law that the
fiduciary duty owed by the Crown toward this nation’s Aboriginal persons has a
unique nature and cannot “serve as a template for the duty of the government to
citizens in other contexts”: Elder Advocates, at paras. 38-40.
[115]      
The Plaintiffs argue that cadets who are engaged
in the Cadet Program are in a situation similar to youths who attend summer
camps or schools. Canada assumes the responsibility and duties associated with a
parent by taking on a supervisory role in exercising authority and control.
[116]      
I find that the relationship is not analogous to
that of parent and child, or that of residential school authorities and
students. The Minister is not charged with day-to-day care of the cadets,
unlike the typical parent and child relationship. And unlike claimants such as
those in Rumley and Seed, the cadets are not in a residential
program, entirely dependent on Canada for their safety and security while
living under the control of its administrators. Unlike the parent or school
with direct supervision of the child, Canada is permitted by legislation to
delegate the duty of supervision within the Cadet Program to individuals who
qualify.
[117]      
The proposed cause of action also suffers in
failing to plead material facts supporting the allegation that Canada
implicitly put the interests of the Class or the Cadet Class above all others, or
facts supporting how Canada undertook to protect the Cadet Class’ entitlement
to be free from sexual misconduct to the exclusion of the same or different
interests of others. The Cadet Program has many participants – male cadets,
supervisors, volunteers, and those who are part of Cadet Leagues. There is no
basis offered in the pleading for how the interests of the Cadet Class were
promised or ensured a priority over the interests of others.
[118]      
And certainly, the relationship between Canada
and the Family Class is not analogous to any of the recognized categories of
fiduciary relationship. The relationship between the government and the Family
Class as disclosed by the pleadings is devoid of the three essential
ingredients necessary to ground a fiduciary relationship.
[119]      
Even if it could be established that there is an
implied duty of loyalty to the Cadet Class above all others, there are no
material facts pled establishing what interests of its own were promoted by
Canada at the expense of the interests of the Cadet Class. While there is a
bald assertion in the Claim that Canada has a duty to fulfill its obligations
to Class Members and not to subordinate those obligations to other interests,
namely its own, those interests that were served by the various breaches
alleged in the Claim go unidentified.
[120]      
And it is difficult to conceive of what that
interest would be. In the context of sexual misconduct against a child, the
breach of trust is committed by the prioritizing of the perpetrator’s own
sexual gratification or need for power and control over a more vulnerable
victim. These were private interests of Evans as they would be of all sexual
predators, which are not shared by Canada. No interest is identified that would
adhere to Canada by failing to administer or enforce policies that would
protect cadets against sexual misconduct.
[121]      
In summary, there is no basis in law for
recognizing this cause of action as between Canada and either the Cadet Class
or the Family Class when the requirements of the cause of action are examined.
Further, the Claim fails to disclose a reasonable cause of action for breach of
fiduciary duty against Canada because the Plaintiffs have failed to plead a
necessary element of this cause of action, namely the first requirement to act
in the interest of the Class above all others. Further, where the elements are
pled, the Claim does not contain facts capable of establishing those elements,
leaving mere conjecture or speculation. As such, it is plain and obvious that
the claim for breach of fiduciary duty will not succeed.
[122]      
The cause of action in negligence is pled at
paragraphs 47 to 55 of the Claim as follows:
[123]      
The scope of Canada’s alleged duty to the class
members is set out in paragraph 49, and the alleged breaches at paragraph 53.
Many of these allegations are broad and unspecified, such as a duty: (a) to
take reasonable care of the Class Members’ physical and mental health [and]
well-being; and (g) to avoid causing the health and well-being of the Class
Members to suffer or deteriorate. The other aspect of the alleged duty is for
Canada to ensure proper administration and compliance with regard to sexual
misconduct policies, including its reporting mechanism.
[124]      
Overall, the Plaintiffs’ pleading is one that
alleges systemic negligence. In such cases, the theory is that the acts or
omissions of the defendant are negligent because they resulted in a system that
was inadequate to protect the class from harm: Levac
v. James, 2023 ONCA 73, at para. 47; White v. Canada (Attorney General), 2002
BCSC 1164, 4 B.C.L.R. (4th) 161, at para. 48.
[125]      
A negligence action requires the plaintiff to
demonstrate: 1) that the defendant owed him a duty of care; 2) that the
defendant’s behaviour breached the standard of care; 3) that the plaintiff
sustained damages; and 4) that the damage was caused, in fact and in law, by
the defendant’s breach: Mustapha v. Culligan of Canada Ltd., 2008 SCC
27, [2008] 2 S.C.R. 114, at para. 3.
[126]      
To establish that they have a reasonable cause
of action in negligence against Canada, the Plaintiffs must show that the
pleading provides a basis upon which Canada could be said to owe a duty of care
to them: Taylor v. Canada (Attorney General), 2012 ONCA 479, 111 O.R.
(3d) 161, at para. 21. The Plaintiffs assert both a statutory and a common law
duty of care owed by Canada to the Class Members.
[127]      
The Plaintiffs have not identified a duty of
care recognized in an analogous case. Their position is that the duty of care
applicable to Canada is the same as has been recognized to apply to school
authorities in the case of Myers v. Peel County Board of Education,
1981 CanLII 27 (SCC), [1981] 2 S.C.R. 21, which is that of a careful or prudent parent. However, they
have not pled such a duty of care and have not produced any authority that
would impose that duty on the Crown in similar circumstances to the Cadet
Program. To state the obvious, we are not dealing here with a school authority,
and there is no claim against an individual employee, as was the case in Myers.
[128]      
That being the case, the existence of a duty
must be determined in accordance with the two-step analysis set out in Anns
v. Merton London Borough Council (1977), [1978] A. C. 728 (U.K.H.L.), at
pp. 751-52. The first step is to inquire whether there is a sufficiently close
relationship between the plaintiff and the defendant that the defendant owes
the plaintiff a prima facie duty of care. This requires an evaluation of
whether the relationship is one in which a duty of care to guard against
foreseeable harm may rightly be imposed: Cooper v. Hobart, 2001 SCC 79, [2001]
3 S.C.R. 537, at para. 32.
[129]      
The second stage of the Anns test
requires a consideration of whether any residual policy considerations exist
that ought to eliminate or reduce the scope of the duty or the class of persons
to whom the duty is owed: at p. 752.
[130]      
The pleading, despite its lack of specificity,
appears sufficient to support a claim that the harms alleged to have been
experienced by those experiencing sexual abuse and sexual harassment against a
backdrop of systemic failure to address sexual misconduct would be a reasonably
foreseeable consequence of a breach of a duty to follow existing policies, as
alleged, and that harm could extend to the family members of those affected.
[131]      
However, to establish proximity, it must be
determined whether Canada owes a private law duty as articulated in paragraph
49 of the Claim.
[132]      
Canada does not involve itself in the day-to-day
conduct of supervision of cadets, nor in supervising the adults. By virtue of
s. 46(2) of the NDA, the Canadian Forces are responsible to the Minister
of National Defence for the control and supervision of the Cadet Program,
including implementing policy. This lack of involvement in the day-to-day
conduct of the Cadet Program weakens the nexus between Canada and the members
of the Class injured as a consequence of sexual misconduct. However, ultimate
responsibility for appropriate policies related to sexual misconduct, and
ensuring compliance with those policies to avoid harm to cadets, ultimately
falls to Canada. This is sufficient, I find to establish a prima facie
duty of care both to the Cadet Class and the Family Class. That duty would
extend to administrative steps, including policy, related to sexual misconduct.
The duty could never extend so broadly, as pleaded, to include a duty to take
reasonable care of the Class Members’ physical and mental health generally.
[133]      
With respect to a statutory duty of care, the
Plaintiffs have referenced the NDA and the regulations and policies
established by the DND in paragraph 48 of the Claim. However, they do not
reference any particular provision, nor explain how this legislation or the
policies create the duty of care articulated in paragraph 49. The legislative
scheme is central to the proximity question. The facts pled could not permit a
finding as to whether the legislative scheme allows or forecloses a private law
duty of care to the Class Members, or if not determinative, whether there is a
sufficiently close and direct relationship created by the statutory scheme to
justify the imposition of a duty of care.
[134]      
The second stage of the Anns test
requires the court to examine whether there may be a reason to negate or limit
the duty. This involves considering whether the duty involves a policy or
operational function. Even though paragraph 47 makes the bare allegation that
Canada’s funding of the Cadet Program has been negligent, the issue of funding
is not raised again in the lists of alleged duties or their breach. Further,
the failure to create policies is not listed among the specifics of Canada’s negligent
conduct, but only the failure to administer, implement and ensure compliance.
[135]      
There is no policy reason to justify curtailing the
duty of care owed to Class members.
[136]      
In summary, I find that the Claim adequately
pleads a duty of care toward Class members to administer and enforce reporting
requirements and policies to prevent and respond to sexual misconduct, and asserts
a theory of systemic negligence by asserting that the impugned acts and
omissions of Canada resulted in a system that was not adequate to protect the
Class from harm.
[137]      
This cause of action is pled at paragraphs 56 to
59 of the Claim, as follows:
[138]      
The five elements of the tort of negligent
misrepresentation are set out in Singh v. Trump, 2016 ONCA 747, 408
D.L.R. (4th) 235, at para. 99, leave to appeal refused, [2016] S.C.C.A. No. 548.
These are:
[139]      
The Plaintiffs have not pled an essential
element of this tort, which is their detrimental reliance on a representation
made by Canada, causing them to forego other, more beneficial courses of action
that they would have taken, absent Canada’s inducement: 1688782 Ontario Inc.
v. Maple Leaf Foods Inc., 2020 SCC 35, [2020] 3 S.C.R. 504, at para. 40.
This factor is determinative of whether proximity can be established in cases
of negligent misrepresentation: Maple Leaf Foods, at para. 32.
[140]      
Additionally, the Claim fails to plead any
specific representations made by Canada. Instead, it makes unsupported
assertions without specifics. As the pleading states that the oral and written
representations were made to Class Members “on dates and at times and places
known to Canada”, it can be inferred that the Plaintiffs do not have information
to support their allegations that misleading representations were made. They
also failed to identify the statutory provisions relied on either to establish
the necessary relationship of proximity, or for the purpose of identifying a
representation.
[141]      
I conclude that it is plain and obvious that the
claim for negligent misrepresentation cannot succeed.
[142]      
The Claim seeks a declaration that Canada has
violated the rights of the Class Members under s. 7 of the Charter in a
manner that was not justified and seeks a remedy or remedies under ss. 24(1).
The claim is set out in paragraphs 29 to 34 of the Claim as follows:
[143]      
At paragraphs 61 and 62 of the Claim, the same
damages are said to flow from each cause of action. There are no distinct and
separate damages that have been pled to flow from the alleged Charter
breach.
[144]      
Section 7 of the Charter provides:
[145]      
In support of this claim, the pleading alleges certain
failures on the part of Canada: a failure to take adequate and timely steps to
protect; a failure to adopt and enforce appropriate investigative techniques;
and a failure to administer appropriate policies.
[146]      
To establish a violation of s. 7, a claimant
must establish that a law or governmental act deprived them of life, liberty or
security of the person, and that the deprivation contravened a principle of
fundamental justice.
[147]      
Canada takes the position that the Charter
claim cannot succeed for two reasons. The first is that it has been framed as a
failure to take positive actions, whereas s. 7 does not generally give rise to
positive obligations on the part of state actors. The Plaintiffs have not pled
any law or governmental action that has deprived the plaintiffs of any
protected interest. Further, the Plaintiffs have not identified the principle
of fundamental justice that is engaged in this case.
[148]      
Second, Canada says the Claim cannot succeed
because it is duplicative of the claims of breach of fiduciary duty and
negligence.
[149]      
In support of the argument that breach of s. 7
cannot be established when it is asserted that the state actor had a positive
obligation to take measures to safeguard one of the Charter protected
interests, Canada relies on Gosselin v. Quebec (Attorney General), 2002
SCC 84, [2002] 4 S.C.R. 429, at paras. 81-83 and Robertson v. Ontario,
2024 ONCA 86, at para. 75. In its earlier decision of Rogers v. Faught (2002),
2002 CanLII 19268 (ON CA), 212 D.L.R. (4th) 366 (Ont. C.A.), the Court rejected the argument that a
failure on the part of the Royal College of Dental Surgeons of Ontario and the
College of Dental Hygienists of Ontario to establish programs and standards of
practice amounted to a violation of the appellant’s rights under section 7 of
the Charter to security of the person. At para. 32, the MacPherson J.A. stated:
[150]      
Both Robertson and Rogers were
recently cited by Morgan J. in Pugliese v. Chartwell, 2024 ONSC 1135 as
a basis for concluding that the plaintiffs could not rely on the Charter
for a cause of action or remedy, as the core submission was the defendant’s
failure to design and put in place infection prevention and control policies
and protocols that were needed during the pandemic.
[151]      
The core of the Claim is about inaction on the
part of Canada. Paragraph 14, under the heading “Nature of the Action”, asserts
that “the discriminatory and sexualized culture in Cadets Canada is a result of
the leadership’s long-standing failure to implement the appropriate policies to
properly train its members and to identify, report, investigate and properly
resolve incidents of sexual assault and sexual harassment”. Each one of the alleged
breaches of fiduciary duty is identified as being a failure, as is each alleged
breach of the duty of care.
[152]      
I see no reason to distinguish this case from Robertson
or Pugliese. The fact that the defendant in this case is the government
does not alter the outcome; in Robertson the defendant was the
government of Ontario. The fact that the Cadet Class is composed of vulnerable
minors also does not change the outcome, as the protection of minors has not
been identified as a principle of fundamental justice nor is this group
afforded special rights under the Charter.
[153]      
With respect to Canada’s second argument, the
Plaintiffs argue that the Charter claim is separate and distinct from
its tort claims. They rely on Vancouver (City) v. Ward, 2010 SCC 27,
[2010] 2 S.C.R. 28, submitting that Ward leaves open the possibility
that the court could award Charter damages even where there are other
possible private law claims for similar damages. While this is true, Ward
establishes that where an alternative remedy such as a tort claim is available
to achieve the objects of compensation, vindication or deterrence and the same
allegations are the foundation for both bases of liability, the plaintiffs
would not be entitled to any additional damages for a Charter breach: paras.
33-34, 68.
[154]      
The Plaintiffs argue in their reply factum that
the impacts and consequences arising from the Charter breaches and the
tortious acts and omissions are not identical. They do not explain why this is
so, nor is it at all apparent from the content of their Claim. As indicated,
the damages alleged to have been caused by Canada’s conduct do not
differentiate between the various bases of liability that have been pled.
[155]      
I can find no distinction in the pleading
between the negligence claim and the Charter claim. In this case the Charter
claim should not proceed. As stated by Benotto J.A. in J.B. v. Ontario
(Child and Youth Services), 2020 ONCA 198, 445 D.L.R. (4th) 642, at para.
60:
[156]      
It is plain and obvious that the Charter
claim cannot succeed.
[157]      
In Banman, at paragraph 185, Perrell J. set
out a methodology for analyzing the certification criterion, in which he listed
the analytical steps. The first step is to determine, as I have done, what
causes of action satisfy the cause of action criteria.
[158]      
The second analytical step is to determine
whether any of those certifiable causes of action are statute barred on the
face of the statement of claim.
[159]      
The Plaintiffs argue that in the absence of a
statement of defence that pleads a limitation defence, this court cannot make
such a determination.
[160]      
The parties have not adequately addressed the
issue of whether this action is statute barred in their factums.
[161]      
In its argument with respect to whether HL is a
suitable representative plaintiff, Canada argued that because vicarious liability
has not been pled, liability would have to be imposed on the Crown through the
federal Crown Liability and Proceedings Act, R.S.C. 1985, c. C-50, s. 3.
This legislation requires a finding of, depending on the applicable province,
damage caused by the fault of a servant of the Crown or a tort committed by a
servant of the Crown. In the circumstances of this case, Canada says the
limitation period would be governed by s. 269 of the NDA. Prior to an
amendment in 2015 that changed the limitation period for bringing an action
against the Crown to two years, the limitation period was six months. During
the time in which HL’s cause of action arose, the former limitation period
applied.
[162]      
Canada relies on the case of McMillan v. Canada,
2023 FC 1752, at para. 110, which was not included in its factum, for the
proposition that the representative plaintiff must be “anchored in the
proceeding”. If the representative plaintiff’s individual claim is definitively
barred because of a limitation period, the representative plaintiff is not
anchored in the proceeding and so is unsuitable as a representative plaintiff.
[163]      
Because of the cursory way in which this issue
was dealt with during argument and in the factums, I am not able to reach a
determination as to whether Canada’s limitation argument should succeed.
[164]      
This criterion requires the court to determine
whether there is some basis in fact for concluding that the class definition is
satisfactory.
[165]      
The proposed class definition has been refined
from that found in the Plaintiffs’ notice of motion. Initially, they sought an
order defining the Class as:
[166]      
As explained by HL in her affidavit, the sexual
misconduct to which she was subjected to by Evans did not involve touching and
no sexual assault took place. His conduct occurred in 2008 and 2009. Her
evidence does not suggest that she faced gender-based discrimination in the
sense that she received less favourable treatment than those of a different
gender or was denied opportunities because of her gender.
[167]      
To repeat, the latest proposed Class definitions
are:
[168]      
The definition of an identifiable class serves
three purposes: (1) it identifies the persons who have a potential claim
against the defendant; (2) it defines the parameters of the lawsuit so as to
identify those persons bound by the result of the action; and (3) it describes who
is entitled to notice: Banman, at para. 263.
[169]      
An identifiable class is one that is defined by
objective criteria, and which has a rational relationship between it and the
common issues: Pearson v. Inco Ltd. (2006), 2006 CanLII 913 (ON CA), 78 O.R. (3d) 641, at para. 57
(Ont. C.A.), rev’d (2004), 2004 CanLII 34446 (ON SCDC), 183 OAC 168 (Div. Ct.). Whether a given person is a
member of the class must be able to be determined without reference to the
merits of the action: Hollick, at para. 16.
[170]      
Accordingly, the Plaintiffs bear the burden of
showing that there is some basis in fact that: (1) the class is defined by
objective criteria; (2) the class can be defined without reference to the
merits of the action; and (3) that there is a rational connection between the
common issues and the proposed class definition.
[171]      
The Plaintiffs must demonstrate that the class
is defined narrowly enough to meet these requirements. Where the class could be
defined more narrowly, the court should either disallow certification or allow
certification on condition that the definition of the class be amended: Hollick,
at para. 21.
[172]      
The evidence must also show some basis in fact
that two or more persons fit within the class definition, as required by s.
5(1)(b) of the CPA: Sun-Rype Products Ltd. v. Archer Daniels Midland
Company, 2013 SCC 58, [2013] 3 S.C.R. 545, at para. 72. Not only must the
Plaintiffs meet that criteria, it is also a fundamental principle that for an
action to be certified, there must be some evidence that two or more class
members suffered compensatory harm: Lilleyman v. Bumblebee Foods LLC,
2023 ONSC 4408, 2023 CarswellOnt 14688 (Ont. S.C.J.), at para. 259, aff’d 2024
ONCA 606, 2024 CarswellOnt 11881 (Ont. C.A.)
[173]      
I will deal first with the requirement to show
some basis in fact for there to be two individuals, at a minimum, that come
within the class definition. As stated in Keatley Surveying Ltd. v. Teranet
Inc., 2015 ONCA 248, 125 O.R. (3d) 447, at para. 70, “it is …  incumbent on
the proposed representative plaintiff to show that there are two or more individuals
who have the same claim as the representative plaintiff to advance”. This does
not mean that other members of the class have to fully share the cause of
action, but only that there are others who have a shared interest in the
resolution of the common issues.
[174]      
With respect to whether there is more than one
member of the class, the Plaintiffs rely on three sources of evidence. It is
Canada’s submission that all of this impugned evidence is either unreliable or
inadmissible. As explained below, I agree.
[175]      
The first derives from HL’s affidavit, in which
she states, at paragraph 44:
[176]      
No affidavits have been provided by any of these
individuals with whom HL states that she has been communicating.
[177]      
The second is an online newspaper article from
the National Post dated May 24, 2016, titled: “Predators and prey: Canada’s
military cadets and the sex misconduct problems few talk about” and
information obtained online from the Government of Canada’s Department of
Justice website: justice.gc.ca. This second category of material is referenced
only in the Plaintiffs’ factum, and not in their evidence.
[178]      
The third is information obtained from reports
and referenced in HL’s affidavit: the 2015 Deschamps Report and the Report
of the Independent External Comprehensive Review of the Department of
National Defence and the Canadian Armed Forces prepared by the Honourable
Louise Arbour in May 2022 (the “Arbour Report”). In her affidavit, HL states
that her personal experience in dealing with Cadets is consistent with the
findings outlined in both reports. Her affidavit asserts that the Cadets
Program is poisoned by the same discriminatory and sexualized culture that
condones and encourages sexual assault and sexual harassment as seen in the
CAF. HL also maintained during the cross-examination on her affidavit that what
is described in these reports is consistent with her experience as a cadet.
[179]      
The direct evidence from HL that she has
communicated with unidentified individuals, “Class Members” who also “suffered
similarly but to different degrees”, does not meet the minimum threshold. It is
hearsay evidence that does not allow the court to objectively evaluate whether
such individuals would fit within the proposed class definition. It is not
enough to suggest that they would qualify by referring to them, as the
affidavit does, as members of the Cadet Class. At least one other individual
should have been identified who could provide independent evidence about her
membership in the Cadet Program, that she experienced sexual misconduct, and
its timing.
[180]      
The newspaper article from the National Post
relied on by the Plaintiffs reported that from 2006 to 2015, there were 245
reported cases of sexual misconduct involving cadets. Newspaper articles are
generally inadmissible as hearsay, lacking in reliability: Democracy Watch
v. Canada (Attorney General), 2024 FCA 75, at para. 7; RWDSU  v.
Saskatchewan, 1987 CanLII 90 (SCC), [1987] 1 S.C.R. 460, at para. 63.
[181]      
In Johnson v. Ontario, 2016 ONSC 5314, 364
C.R.R. (2d) 17, on a certification motion Grace J. was faced with the
plaintiff’s reliance on newspaper articles, as well as inquest material, an
Ombudsman’s report and reasons for sentence. Noting that newspaper articles are
generally inadmissible, and that a certification motion “is not to be treated
as an evidentiary free for all”, he permitted the newspaper article and the
other documents to provide additional support to the evidence of the two
plaintiffs: paras. 51, 54 and 65. In Johnson, both had provided sworn
evidence of the treatment that they endured while incarcerated. This is
distinguishable from the case before me, where there is evidence only from HL
as a member of the proposed Cadet Class. Grace J. also stated, at paragraph 63,
that the newspaper articles and additional material would not, standing alone,
provide some basis in fact for the remaining elements of the certification
test.
[182]      
The information on sexual assaults cited in the
“Overview” section of the Plaintiffs’ factum talks about the incidents of
reporting of sexual assaults, derived from the Government of Canada’s official
website. This too has been offered to form some basis in fact for there being
more victims than HL. This information does not assist the Plaintiffs in
establishing this criterion, as the information is not specific to the Cadets
Program and does not even reference cadets.
[183]      
The third category is the Deschamps and Arbour Reports.
The Plaintiffs argue that, as Canada has referenced the Deschamps Report in its
material to explain the development of reforms made within the cadets to
address sexual misconduct, they too should be able to rely on them as evidence
on this motion.
[184]      
In Rumley (SCC), the Supreme Court of
Canada relied on reports of the Ombudsman and of special counsel retained by
the Attorney General of British Columbia in upholding a certification decision.
However, both of those reports had been commissioned to investigate the topic
of sexual and physical abuse of children throughout the history of the Jericho
Hill School, which was also the basis of the class action. Further, as pointed
out by Cullity J. in Dolmage v. Ontario, 2010 ONSC 1726, 6 C.P.C. (7th)
168, at paragraph 59, there is no indication that an objection had been taken
to reliance on those reports until after the decision of the Supreme Court of
Canada.
[185]      
The Arbour and Deschamps Reports are not
similarly placed. They were not commissioned to address the topic of sexual misconduct
within the Cadet Program. Further, there is no way to determine if the authors
of the reports relied on evidence that may not be admissible in a civil trial,
as their conclusions and the basis for them cannot be tested. Neither of the
reports was made for the purpose of being used in a civil trial. In Robb v.
St. Joseph’s Health Care Centre, [1998] O.J. No. 5394  (Gen. Div.),
at paragraph 24, Macdonald J., referring to the Report of the Royal
Commission of Inquiry into the Blood System, stated:
[186]      
In Dolmage, Cullity J. rejected the
proposition that reports might be admissible for the truth of their contents
for the purpose of certification: paras. 59-61. He noted that the reasoning in Robb
has been cited and applied in other cases including Ernewein v. General
Motors of Canada Ltd. 2005 BCCA 540, 46 B.C.L.R. (4th) 234, leave to appeal
refused, [2005] S.C.C.A. No. 545; R. v. Dykstra, 2008 CanLII 34355 (ON SC), [2008] O.J. No. 2745
(S.C.), and Radke v. M.S. (Litigation Guardian of) 2005 BCSC 1355, 48
B.C.L.R. (4th) 178.
[187]      
The Plaintiffs have raised a final argument with
respect to the admissibility of the Arbour and Deschamps reports. They submit
that they should be admitted under the public document exception to the hearsay
rule.  They rely on Perell J.’s decision in R.G. v. The Hospital for Sick
Children, 2017 ONSC 6545, at paras. 21-26. In that case, at issue was the
admissibility of an independent review completed by the Honourable Susan Lang:
the Independent Review of the Motherisk Drug Testing Laboratory at Toronto’s
Hospital for Sick Children. Perell J. did not in fact decide the issue of
whether the review was admissible under the public document exception. For the
reasons outlined at paragraph 26 of R.G., he found that many of the
facts contained in the review were admissible for the purpose of the
certification hearing, although they could not be admitted as proof of the
merits of the plaintiff, Ms. R.G.’s claim.
[188]      
The same conclusion could never be drawn in this
case. The basis of the action in R.G. was harm occasioned by inaccurate
testing results produced by the Motherisk Drug Testing Laboratory operated by
the Hospital for Sick Children, the same topic that formed the basis of the independent
review.
[189]      
I conclude that where there are commissioned reports
that address the same underlying issues that form the basis of the action,
there is authority to take them into account as some evidence of this
criterion, as was the situation in Rumley (SCC) and R.G..
[190]      
As previously stated, the Deschamps and Arbour Reports
were not undertaken to explore the culture within the Cadet Program, or its
policies and adherence to them. The Reports did not extrapolate on whether
their findings could be extended to include the Cadet Program. The Deschamps Report
was restricted to examining sexual misconduct within the CAF. The mandate for the
Arbour Report was an examination of the handling of sexual misconduct by the
military justice system, and to examine recruitment, training, performance
evaluation, posting and promotion systems in the CAF. The Honourable Louise
Arbour’s fact gathering, submissions and consultations were with members from
both DND and CAF. However, as she stated when discussing her mandate, on page
20, the focus of the report is on the CAF. The Cadet Program was never
mentioned.
[191]      
As a result, it is impossible to draw the
conclusion, as Perrell J. did in R.G., that many of the facts contained
in the reports are not contentious or are common ground among the parties or
are not hearsay with respect to the issues to be determined on the
certification motion, or contain facts admissible pursuant to the recognized
hearsay exceptions for business records or admissions by a party.
[192]      
The evidentiary requirement to meet the last
four certification requirements is not onerous. But the court must have some
admissible evidence upon which to conclude that the criterion has been met.
[193]      
There is one further source of evidence of
potential class members. In its answers to undertakings provided at the
cross-examination of Adriana Oulton, Canada has provided evidence of the number
of reported complaints that have come to their attention. Their answers are as
follows:
[194]      
Canada argued that these answers are unhelpful
to the plaintiff, as the numbers are not broken down by gender and no evidence
was provided about the source of the information, how the statistics were
gathered or anything about the nature of the complaints. While this is true,
more important is that numbers alone do not offer evidence of the systemic
negligence due to failure to follow polices that is alleged by the Plaintiffs.
No information is provided about the response within the Cadets Program to
those complaints. No information is provided that would link these complaints
to a breach of any of the duties of care alleged in the claim. And while it is
statistically likely that female cadets are among the number of complainants,
the onus was on the Plaintiffs to secure that information from Canada, as the
court cannot speculate. There is also no evidence as to whether an “adult in
authority” was a participant in the Cadet Program, or whether this also
captures complaints made about teachers, parents, and other adults in a cadet’s
life.
[195]      
What the court is left with is HL’s evidence of
what occurred to her, and her only. As other cases have recognized, there is a
need for the Plaintiff to show that her claim is not just idiosyncratic: Ducharme
v. Solarium de Paris Inc. (2007), 2007 CanLII 14346 (ON SC), 48 C.P.C. (6th) 194 (Ont. S.C.) at para. 29,
aff’d [2008] O.J. No. 1558 (Div. Ct.) and Zicherman v. Equitable Life
Insurance Co. of Canada (2000), 47 C.C.L.I. (3d) 39 (Ont. S.C.), at paras.
7-9.
[196]      
In the result, this action cannot be certified
due to s. 5(1)(b) of the CPA not being satisfied.
[197]      
For completeness, I will continue the analysis
despite concluding that the Plaintiffs have not produced sufficient evidence to
meet the class criterion.
[198]      
I will next consider whether the class is
defined by objective criteria.
[199]      
The Plaintiffs’ revised class definition comes from
Rumley v. British Columbia, 1999 BCCA 689, 72 B.C.L.R. (3d) 1 (“Rumley
(BCCA)”) in which the Court of Appeal defined the class at para. 51 as:
[200]      
The Court of Appeal’s decision was upheld by the
Supreme Court of Canada (Rumley (SCC)). Two years later, a
decertification motion was heard in the case by Humphries J. (Rumley et al.
v. HMTQ, 2003 BCSC 234). While she did not grant the motion to decertify, Humphries
J. redefined the common issues.
[201]      
It is apparent from her Reasons that the action
had become unwieldy because, contrary to what had been assumed by the higher
courts, there was no admission of wide-spread abuse throughout the school’s
history. At paragraph 30, she stated that the assertion that “it is now clear
that sexual and physical abuse of children took place at the school throughout
its history”, which had not yet been proved, “puts the defendant to the task of
identifying an unending series of circumstances in order to attempt to answer,
refute or admit on a piece-meal basis the facts which underlie that assertion”.
[202]      
The certified common issues covered a 42-year
period, during which there was variation in the standard of care. At paragraph
61, Humphries J. stated:
[203]      
The question is whether “misconduct of a sexual
nature” can be defined by objective criteria, such that this action does not likewise
turn into an unmanageable morass.
[204]      
There are three other cases provided by the
Plaintiffs in which the class definition included “sexual misconduct”. One of
those is Heyder. Again, that certification proceeded on consent, with
little analysis by the presiding judge in the face of the relaxed criterion.
[205]      
In Heyder the classes were proposed to be
defined as follows at para. 31:
[206]      
At paragraph 32, Fothergill J. simply concluded
that “[t]hese classes are clearly identifiable based on objective criteria and
meet the requirement of Rule 334.16(1)(b) [of the Federal Court Rules].”
[207]      
In White v. Canada (Attorney General),
2004 BCSC 99, 24 B.C.L.R. (4th) 347 (“White (2004)”) the court certified
an action in which the class definition was “all former members of the Canadian
Sea Cadets, Captain Vancouver Corps, at HMCS Discovery who suffered sexual
abuse or sexual misconduct between 1967 and 1977”: at para. 5. The defendant
challenged the class definition on the basis that it was unclear and
overinclusive because it failed to connect the sexual abuse to the Sea Cadet
Program. It also failed to put the class definition on an objectively
discernible basis, for example, not limiting it to a specific geographical
area. But the breadth and certainty of the term “sexual misconduct” was not
challenged.
[208]      
White (2004) is
not binding on me and, as I will discuss later, can be differentiated from the
Plaintiffs’ proposed class action in several respects. For now, suffice to say
that the case does not resolve the problem of whether this class definition
communicates to a person that they can claim membership in the class.
[209]      
In Steele v. Leduc (City), 2023 ABKB 460,
the court certified a class action in which the identifiable class was “all female
current and former employees who worked for [the City of] Leduc between 2002
and the date of certification who allege that they were subject to
discrimination, sexual misconduct, or sexual assault at Leduc”: at para. 15.
The parties had reached a settlement through mediation, which the court was
also asked to approve. Accordingly, like Heyder, it proceeded on consent.
There was no analysis in the case as to why the class criterion was satisfied,
other than the court noting that there were nine women who provided affidavits
stating that they were subject to discrimination, sexual misconduct and/or
sexual assault at Leduc in that timeframe. Accordingly, that case is also of
limited assistance.
[210]      
The phrase “misconduct of a sexual nature” is
undefined and problematic. Identifying when behaviour is sexual in nature is
not always straightforward. It is unclear whether the alleged perpetrator would
have to have a sexual purpose in mind before the incident would qualify as
conduct of a sexual nature, or whether the subjective perception of the
potential class member would be enough. If the latter, then the criterion
cannot be said to be able to be determined on an objective basis. One former
cadet may perceive that overhearing a single lewd joke is “conduct of a sexual
nature”, while another may perceive that gender-based discrimination qualifies
as conduct of a sexual nature. If the alleged perpetrator’s state of mind is
the qualifying factor, each complaint would have to be evaluated on its merits
to determine the intent of the alleged perpetrator, including an examination of
the entire circumstances so that the act or conduct could be looked at in
context to see if there was sexual intent.
[211]      
The Plaintiffs’ counsel rightly points out that
the term “misconduct of a sexual nature” is used in subsection 16(1)(h.1) of
the Limitations Act, 2002, S.O. 2002, c. 24, Sched. B. However,
that term is not defined in the Limitations Act, 2002, and this court
was not referred to any cases that interpreted that phrase.
[212]      
During their submissions, the Plaintiffs’
counsel has made it clear that their revised definition could include sexual
assault, sexual harassment and/or gender-based discrimination.
[213]      
The Criminal Code offences with which Evans was
charged are undoubtedly captured by the term “misconduct of a sexual nature”.
But when one considers the sheer number of cadets and adults in the
organization and the variety of situations that may have to be considered, it
is difficult to see how this definition is objective and ascertainable.
[214]      
This definitional quandary may explain why some
cases involving sexual misconduct have avoided it completely.
[215]      
For example, in Elwin v. Nova Scotia Home for
Coloured Children, 2013 NSSC 411, 339 N.S.R. (2d) 35, the plaintiffs
alleged that they suffered physical, mental and sexual abuse while in the
institution, but the proposed class was defined as “residents or former
residents, who, as wards of the Province, were placed in the NSHCC as
residents”: at para. 1. This is obviously a closed class, ascertainable on an
objective basis.
[216]      
Similarly, in Seed, the action’s
underlying allegation was abuse, including sexual abuse, perpetrated against
students at a school for the visually impaired. The proposed class did not
refer to sexual abuse, but only included “all persons who have attended or
resided at Ross MacDonald from January 1, 1951 to the present day and who were
alive as of February 22, 2009” and their family members: at para. 113.
[217]      
The other reason that this proposed definition
is overly broad is because it proposes to begin in 2000, and it would include non-consensual
sexual contact, otherwise known as sexual assault. There is no evidence that HL
was sexually assaulted, and no evidence of any experience by her prior to 2008.
There is no evidentiary basis to allow for a class definition that would extend
to sexual assault, or that would start earlier than 2008.
[218]      
The last requirement is that the proposed class
definition be rationally linked to the common issues. This too is problematic. Again,
this claim is cast as a systemic negligence action arising out of lack of
policies or procedures, or failure to follow them, that allowed harms to be
suffered. In HL’s case, the harm arises not just from the sexual misconduct of
Evans, but from what happened or did not happen following that. It is alleged
that there was a failure to follow-through after the incident was reported to
the supervisor, and either no policies existed, or they were not followed to
attempt to provide help to HL. By limiting the Cadet Class only to those who
suffered harm and damages due to misconduct of a sexual nature, the link to the
common issues is not established.
[219]      
The Plaintiffs’ counsel submitted that the Plaintiffs
should be permitted to amend the class definition if it was found not meet the
required criterion. Mr. Singer relies on Knisley v. Attorney General of Canada,
2024 ONSC 3528. The Plaintiffs also suggest that there is precedent for
redrafting the class definition or common issues from appellate courts that
have done so on appeal, such as in Rumley (BCCA), at paras. 51
and 52.
[220]      
In Knisley, rather than refusing to
certify the class action, Sutherland J. opted to certify it on the condition
that the class definition be amended. He did not state an alternative,
acceptable version. With respect, this approach appears to be at odds with the
duty of the motions judge to certify only if all of the preconditions for
certification have been met.
[221]      
In Keatley Surveying Ltd. v. Teranet Inc.,
2014 ONSC 1677, 119 O.R. (3d) 497 (Div. Ct.) (“Keatley (Div. Ct.)”),
Sachs, J. reviewed the cases in which courts hearing a certification motion, or
appellate courts, had exercised or declined to exercise such authority. She noted
that there appeared to be two lines of authority touching on this issue in the
class action context: at para. 17.
[222]      
In Brown v. Canada (Attorney General),
2013 ONCA 18, 114 O.R. (3d) 355, the motion judge found that the pleadings did
not disclose a cause of action, but nonetheless certified the class action
conditionally upon the plaintiffs amending their cause of action. The motion
judge also adopted a class definition that was different than that suggested by
the plaintiffs. Rosenberg J.A. commented on this active exercise of power at
paras. 44-46 as follows:
[223]      
In McCracken v. Canadian National Railway,
2012 ONCA 445, 111 O.R. (3d) 745, the motion judge rejected proposed common
issues because they lacked commonality, and then created a revised set of
common issues. On appeal, Winkler C.J.O. rejected these revised issues and
stated, at paragraph 144:
[224]      
Winkler C.J.O. also referenced his earlier
decision in Caputo v. Imperial Tobacco Ltd. (2004), 2004 CanLII 24753 (ON SC), 236 D.L.R. (4th) 348
(Ont. S.C.), at para. 41, where he stated:
[225]      
Sachs J. concluded, at paragraph 18 of Keatley
(Div. Ct.), that the Court of Appeal has consistently held that “provided
the defendant is not prejudiced, it is open to a plaintiff to recast its case
to make it more suitable for certification” based on Markson v. MBNA Canada
Bank, 2007 ONCA 334, 85 O.R. (3d) 321, at para. 39, leave to appeal
refused, [2007] S.C.C.A. No. 346; Kumar v. Mutual Life Assurance Company of
Canada (2003), 2003 CanLII 48334 (ON CA), 226 D.L.R. (4th) 112 (Ont. C.A.), at para. 30; and Pearson
v. Inco Ltd. (2005), 2006 CanLII 913 (ON CA), 78 O.R. (3d) 641 (C.A.), at para. 55.
[226]      
In this case, the Plaintiffs have already
amended the proposed definition of the class three times, the last time during
the three-day long argument of the motion. At this point, Canada would be
manifestly prejudiced by any further change made by the court at the invitation
of the Plaintiffs, especially without alternative phrasing being proposed by
them. Canada will not have an opportunity to respond to any new proposed
definition, and altering the definition of the class could recast many of
Canada’s positions and arguments. I decline to wade into the litigation arena
to make any changes.
[227]      
This is of course, an academic point entirely,
since regardless of any problems with the class definition, the class criteria was
not satisfied.
[228]      
For the purposes of analysis only, this section
assumes that the class criteria was satisfied.
[229]      
It is a condition for certification that the
claims or defences of the class members raise common issues.
[230]      
This requirement has been described as a low
bar: Cloud (ONCA), at para. 52. However, there must be an evidentiary
basis – again, some basis in fact – for establishing the existence of a common
issue that exists beyond a bare assertion in the pleadings: Fulawka v. Bank
of Nova Scotia, 2012 ONCA 443, 111 O.R. (3d) 346, at para. 79, leave to
appeal refused, [2012] S.C.C.A. No. 326.
[231]      
An issue will be common where its resolution is
necessary to resolve each of the class members’ claims: Hollick, at para.
18. The point behind a common issue is that its resolution will avoid
duplication of fact-finding or legal analysis of an issue that is a substantial
ingredient of each class member’s claim: Western Canadian Shopping Centres
Inc., at para 39. Its resolution will advance the litigation for or against
the class: Fulawka, at para. 81.
[232]      
A common issue cannot be dependent upon
individual findings of fact that have to be made with respect to each
individual claimant: Williams v. Mutual Life Assurance Co. of Canada, 2000 CanLII 22704 (ON SC), 51
O.R. (3d) 54 (S.C.), at para. 39, aff’d (2003) 2003 CanLII 48334 (ON CA), 226 D.L.R. (4th) 112 (C.A.) and
2003 CanLII 21250 (ON CA), 226 D.L.R. (4th) 131 (C.A.); Fulawka, at para. 81.
[233]      
The common issues are not to be stated in the
most general terms: Rumley (SCC), at para. 29. To do so, “would
not serve the ends of either fairness or efficiency” and inevitably such an
action would ultimately break down into individual proceedings: Rumley (SCC),
at para. 29.
[234]      
If questions relating to causation or damages
are proposed as common issues, the plaintiff must demonstrate that there is a
workable methodology for determining such issues on a class-wide basis: Chadha
v. Bayer Inc. (2003), 2003 CanLII 35843 (ON CA), 63 O.R. (3d) 22 (C.A.), at para. 52, leave to appeal refused,
[2003] S.C.C.A. No. 106; Fulawka, at para. 81.
[235]      
Out of the eight proposed common questions, only
questions 1 and 2 (negligence); 8 (damages); and 9 and 10 (punitive damages)
remain following my conclusions about the causes of action that are viable.
[236]      
For ease of reference, the remaining proposed
common issues are:
[237]      
I will deal first with questions relating to
negligence.
[238]      
Question 1 is so broad as to be meaningless. It
begs the question, a duty of care to do/not do what? At a minimum, a common
issue relating to a duty of care should at least bear some relationship to the
duties of care alleged in the pleading. This proposed common issue suggests an all-encompassing
duty of care to each female cadet in all circumstances. It does not reference
the duties alleged at paragraph 49 of the Claim. Those alleged duties are: to ensure
implementation and compliance with the policies of the Cadet Program; the duty
to take reasonable steps to rectify any failures or deficiencies in the
implementation or administration of the Cadet Program (presumably related to
training, screening and supervision of adult members); and duties related to
avoid causing injury to the health and well-being of the Class Members
(presumably from harms occasioned by sexual misconduct and the response/non-response
from the organization). By answering whether the defendant owed a duty of care
to the Plaintiffs alone, in an indeterminate timeframe and in indeterminate
circumstances, does not advance the litigation for the Class Members.
[239]      
As in other cases alleging systemic negligence,
such as Cloud or Rumley, the resolution of whether a duty of care
is owed to all members of the class, and the specific nature of that duty,
would be a significant component of the claim of every class member. But the way
this common issue is framed bears no relationship to the Claim. A common issue
that fails to define the scope of the duty of care inevitably would lead to
inefficiency.
[240]      
Question 2 suffers from the same central problem
of being overly broad, but to a greater degree. The standard of care is not put
forward as a common issue. The Claim alleges that the standard of care required
policies to be implemented and followed in order to protect minors from suffering
physical and emotional harm from sexual misconduct, and that standard of care
was not met. HL’s evidence explains her experience of how that standard was not
met in her case. However, this will not necessarily reflect the experience of
other class members. As the makeup of the Cadets Program indicates, there are a
staggering number of individuals involved. There are over a thousand cadet
organizations, and the statistics provided in the Oultan affidavit indicates
that there were 108,424 female cadets enrolled from 2008 forward. The claim has
no geographical restriction and any number of potential perpetrators including
CIC officers, parent volunteers, league members, civilian volunteers, civilian
instructors and senior cadets. To make findings of liability, a court will be
required to consider and assess the relationship between each victim, the
alleged perpetrator, and the knowledge and response of those in charge to
determine if their situation can fit within the rubric of systemic failures
alleged in the Claim.
[241]      
Further, as the Oultan affidavit indicates,
there are many policies and procedures that have been adopted by the Cadet
Program. Allegations of non-compliance by each class member would require
individual factual findings and legal analysis that will differ on a
case-by-case basis, depending on which policy or procedure has been run afoul.
[242]      
While it may be common across the class to share
an interest in the question of whether Canada failed to have in place adequate
procedures and enforcement to ensure the proper administration of its sexual
misconduct policies and procedures, whether Canada failed to respond in
accordance with those policies to complaints of sexual misconduct in each
instance could never be a common issue.
[243]      
The Plaintiffs submit that the proposed common
issue with respect to the standard of care requires expert and fact evidence,
and the certification of this issue will avoid duplication of fact-finding and
legal analysis, which would otherwise have to be performed “hundreds, if not
thousands of times across the actions”. The Plaintiffs have not presented
expert evidence on this motion, nor have they identified specifically what
issue a proposed expert report would address that would be common across the
Class.
[244]      
Further, in order to make findings of liability,
as discussed earlier when considering a proposed class that had experienced
“misconduct of a sexual nature”, a contextualized inquiry needs to be done to
determine whether there has been any breach. These determinations cannot be determined
in common across the class.
[245]      
In practice, this broadly worded common issue
will in fact break down, out of necessity, into a multitude of individual
issues.
[246]      
Accordingly, the proposed common issue does not
negate the need for individual inquiries into a breach of the standard of care.
[247]      
I agree with the argument of Canada that this
proposed class action can be distinguished from White (2004), the only
other class action involving cadets. The allegations of sexual abuse in White
(2004) were confined to a single local cadet corps with a limited number
of perpetrators (five) whose positions and identities were known. Two of the
perpetrators had already been convicted of criminal offences, and charges were pending
against another. The case involved allegations occurring at a single location,
which was a Navy reserve facility in Vancouver, over a ten-year period: paras. 5,
15 and 20-25. By contrast, in this proposed class action, in addition to a vast
number of potential perpetrators, at a common issues trial, the court could be
dealing with a wide array of locations and circumstances, some in which there
is supervision and some not, and others that could have occurred outside the premises
for authorized cadet activities. As HL’s evidence outlined, most if not all of
Evans’ misconduct took place outside of organized cadet activities.
[248]      
The Plaintiffs submit that the proposed common
issues with respect to the existence and breach of Canada’s duty of care are
analogous to similar common issues courts have certified in negligence claims,
citing Rumley (SCC), Robertson, Johnson, and Cavanaugh
v. Grenville Christian College, 2014 ONSC 290. These cases can be easily
differentiated in a way that explains why it may have been possible in those
cases to certify common issues. In Rumley (SCC), the case was decided by
the Supreme Court of Canada as though the existence of abuse was admitted. The
proposed common issues were also limited to students from a single school, as
was the case in Cavanaugh, Elwin, and Seed. In Johnson
the common issues were limited to inmates from a single provincial correctional
facility and confined to a period of less than a year. Robertson was
focused on a narrow allegation of delay in issuing mandatory Covid-19
directives for long-term care homes in Ontario.
[249]      
Further, the Plaintiffs’ affidavits do not show
some basis in fact for the proposed common issue. As previously stated, HL’s
affidavit is limited to her individual experience of sexual misconduct and does
not provide a basis for a common issue involving breach of a standard of care
in the Cadet Program over 23 years. As I have already found, the Deschamps and
Arbour Reports cannot be used as substantive evidence on this motion to provide
some basis in fact for breach of a standard of care across the Class.
[250]      
In Banman, Perell J. certified common
issues of negligence because there was a common issue about a breakdown in the
system in the Psychosocial Treatment Program at the
St. Thomas Psychiatric Hospital. In doing so, he found that there was
some basis in fact for the issue of systemic breakdown, which the individual
issues could not negate: paras. 107, 285. He reasoned that the resolution of
the common issues would advance the class members’ causes of action, acting as
the catalyst for the further progression of the individual actions: paras.
287-88.
[251]      
In contrast, there is no basis in fact for
systemic wrongdoing that has been presented on the evidence. The Plaintiffs have
not provided evidence showing some basis in fact that the alleged breach of the
policies form common issues that actually exist. Without some basis in fact for
systemic fault, the class members’ claims of negligence would need to be
determined on an individual basis.
[252]      
I have considered whether (assuming the class
criterion had been met) this court could have permitted the Plaintiffs to amend
the proposed Common Issues relating to negligence. I have considered the common
issues that were initially proposed for this cause of action in the notice of
motion, as questions 8 through 11. These are as follows:
[253]      
In my view, the substitution of any or all of
these questions does not resolve or alleviate any of the problems that prevent
questions 1 and 2 from being certified.
[254]      
Moving on to common issue 8 regarding damages,
it follows that damages cannot be determined in common due to both the
individualized nature of the allegations, and because there is a lack of
evidence for damages beyond that presented for HL individually.
[255]      
As stated in Banman, at para. 303, “a
precondition to an aggregate damages common question being available pursuant
to s.24 (1) of the Class Proceedings Act, 1992 is that liability or a
minimum level of liability can be established at the common issues trial”,
citing Ramdath v. George Brown College of Applied Arts and Technology,
2015 ONCA 921, 392 D.L.R. (4th) 490 and Fulawka.
[256]      
In this case, both causation and damages will
never be established at the common issues trial and accordingly this
prerequisite for aggregate damages is not satisfied.
[257]      
In Lilleyman, at paragraph 362, Perell J.
again explained the basis upon which an award of aggregate damages may be made:
[258]      
There is no evidence to support the conduct of
an aggregate damages assessment. While the Plaintiffs’ counsel provided the
court with a sample aggregate chart, it was for demonstrative purposes only and
was not included in the motion record. There is also nothing in the proposed
litigation plan with respect to the procedure for such an assessment. In Canada
v. Greenwood, 2021 FCA 186, the court was faced with similar lack of
evidence. At paragraph 188, the court stated:
[259]      
Moving on to common issues 9 and 10 regarding punitive
damages, the issue of whether punitive damages are warranted can only be
established following the determinations to be made at individual trials and so
lacks commonality.
[260]      
Once again, this criterion is being examined
only to complete the academic exercise.
[261]      
This criterion is prescribed by sections 5(1)(d)
and 5(1.1) of the CPA. Section 6 of the CPA guides the court on
the grounds upon which the court should not rely to refuse to certify a proceeding.
The addition of s. 5(1.1) through the 2020 amendments to the CPA imposes
a stricter test for preferability than the former one: Banman, at paras.
317-18.
[262]      
Subsection 5(1.1) requires determining whether:
[263]      
For a plaintiff to establish that the class
action would be the preferred procedure, the Plaintiffs must establish some
basis in fact that the proposed class action would be a fair, efficient and
manageable method of advancing the claim, and that it is better than any other
reasonably available means of resolving the claims of the proposed Class
Members: Hollick, at paras. 28, 31; AIC Limited v. Fisher, 2013
SCC 69, [2013] 3 S.C.R. 949, at para. 48. These two tests are to be measured
through the lens of the purposes of the CPA, namely, access to justice,
behaviour modification and judicial economy: Banman, at para. 315.
[264]      
The common issues are to be looked at together
to determine whether they predominate over the individual issues, in order to
ensure that the objective of judicial economy is achieved and that access to
justice is achieved by having the claims of the class members sufficiently
advanced through the mechanism of a class action: Banman, at para. 321.
[265]      
The first step in the preferred procedure analysis
is whether the class action would be manageable. Even though the causes of
action have been pared down to include only negligence, as the proceeding
discussion has illustrated, this has done little to circumscribe the case. The
scope and breadth of this national organization, the number of different
activities in which it engages at different locations, the number of adults who
interact with cadets and their status, the various policies, and the breadth of
conduct that may or may not constitute sexual misconduct, all impact on the standard
of care and whether there has been a breach.
[266]      
As I have concluded, there is little way to
avoid the proposed class action devolving into individual actions on the
question of liability alone. Causation and damages would be a whole other area
of individual, case-by-case analysis with no evidence common across the
proposed class.
[267]      
As I have determined, there are no proposed
common issues that meet the threshold for certification. Accordingly, it is a
false exercise to attempt to look at the proposed common issues collectively to
determine whether they predominate over the individual issues.
[268]      
Even if there were common issues that could be
certified, the nature of the action is such that the individual issues would
still predominate, preventing the class action from being a superior means over
individual trials. Viewing this through the lens of judicial economy and access
to justice, there is no basis on which the court can determine that a class
action would be superior to individual actions.
[269]      
Assuming for the moment that the class period
was restricted to begin in 2008 and that the proposed identified class
definition could be certified (and all the other criteria had been met), I
conclude that HL would be an appropriate representative plaintiff.
[270]      
There is no evidence contradicting her sworn
evidence that she would act in the best interests of the proposed Cadet Class.
There is no evidence that she has a conflict of interest with other members of
the Cadet Class.
[271]      
The same is true for ML as a representative
plaintiff for the Family Class. However, as a derivative class, the Family
Class cannot be certified if the Cadet Class is not certified: Ann Schwoob
et al. v. Bayer Inc., 2013 ONSC 2207, at para. 30.
[272]      
I have not gone so far as to determine whether
the litigation plan provided by the Plaintiffs is remotely workable given the
other conclusions reached in these Reasons.
[273]      
For the above reasons, this court orders that the
Plaintiffs’ motion to certify their action pursuant to the CPA is
dismissed.
[274]      
If the parties are unable to reach a decision on
costs within 30 days of the release of these Reasons, they may each submit
brief written costs outlines. They are due on the following schedule: The
Defendant’s submissions are due by January 10, 2024, the Plaintiffs’ by January
20, 2024 and any reply, if necessary by January 24, 2025. Written submissions
are limited to 5 double-spaced pages, plus a costs outline and any settlement
offers. Counsel may extend these dates by mutual agreement, with notice to me
through BarrieSCJJudAssistants@ontario.ca.
[275]      
The submissions are to be filed with the court,
with a copy emailed to my judicial assistant at BarrieSCJJudAssistants@ontario.ca,
in addition to being uploaded to Case Center with hyperlinks as required.